Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4303
(UDTA 3) Application; principal place of administration.

(UDTA 3) The Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act applies to a trust, whenever created, that has its principal place of administration in this state, subject to the following rules:

(1) If the trust was created before September 7, 2019, the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act applies only to a decision or action occurring on or after September 7, 2019.

(2) If the principal place of administration of the trust is changed to this state on or after September 7, 2019, the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act applies only to a decision or action occurring on or after the date of the change.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 3.